Vermont, session 2025-2026, H366.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
An individual has the right to:
(1) mental and neural data privacy;
(2) the freedom of thought;
(3) cognitive liberty;
(4) change an individual’s decision regarding neurotechnology and the
right to determine by what means to change that decision;
VT LEG #379396 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.366
2025 Page 2 of 6
(5) be afforded protection from neurotechnological interventions of the
mind and from unauthorized access to or manipulation of an individual’s brain
activity; and
(6) be afforded protection from unauthorized neurotechnological
alterations in mental functions critical to personality.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 42C is added to read:
CHAPTER 42C. NEUROLOGICAL RIGHTS
§ 1889. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Brain-computer interface” means a device that enables its user to
interact with a computer by means of brain activity only.
(2) “Conscious decision making” means an individual making a
deliberate decision with awareness and intention.
(3) “Consciousness bypass” means the use of neurotechnology to
manipulate brain activity by applying electrical or optical stimuli without the
conscious awareness of the individual whose brain activity is being
manipulated.
(4) “Neural data” means information that is generated by the
measurement of the activity of an individual’s central or peripheral nervous
systems and that can be processed by or with the assistance of a device.
VT LEG #379396 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.366
2025 Page 3 of 6
(5) “Neurotechnology” means the assembly of methods and instruments
that enable a direct connection of technical components with the nervous
system of an individual.
(6) “Written informed consent” means the written consent given
voluntarily by an individual with capacity, on the individual’s own behalf or on
behalf of another in the role of an agent, guardian, or surrogate, after being
fully informed of the nature, benefits, risks, and consequences of the proposed
agreement.
§ 1890. NEURAL DATA PRIVACY
(a) Prohibition. Subject to the limited exceptions provided in this section,
no person shall:
(1) collect or record an individual’s neural data gathered from a brain-
computer interface; or
(2) share with a third party an individual’s neural data gathered from a
brain-computer interface.
(b) Consent to collect. A person shall not collect or record an individual’s
neural data gathered from a brain-computer interface unless the person:
(1) provides the individual with a written notice explaining how the
person will use the individual’s neural data; and
(2) thereafter receives written informed consent from the individual to
collect or record the individual’s neural data.
VT LEG #379396 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.366
2025 Page 4 of 6
(c) Consent to share. A person shall not share with a third party an
individual’s neural data gathered from a brain-computer interface unless the
person:
(1) provides the individual with a written request for the individual’s
neural data to be shared with a third party and for what purposes, including the
name and address of the third party; and
(2) thereafter receives written informed consent from the individual to
share the individual’s neural data with the third party.
(d) Revocation of consent.
(1) An individual who has provided written informed consent allowing a
person to collect, record, or share the individual’s neural data pursuant to this
section has the right to revoke consent at any time thereafter by providing
written notice to the person initially receiving the consent. This revocation of
consent notice shall be as easy or easier for the individual to provide as
compared to the requirements for initially providing consent.
(2) A person who receives written notice from an individual revoking
consent pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall:
(A) destroy all records of the individual’s neural data not later than
10 days after receiving the notice; and
(B) in the case of the revocation of consent to share an individual’s
neural data, immediately:
VT LEG #379396 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.366
2025 Page 5 of 6
(i) cease sharing an individual’s neural data with all third parties
upon receipt of the notice; and
(ii) inform all third parties with whom the person has shared the
individual’s neural data that the individual has revoked consent.
§ 1891. CONSCIOUSNESS BYPASS LIMITATIONS
(a) Specific consent required.
(1) A person shall not allow a brain-computer interface it manufactures
to be used to bypass the conscious decision making of an individual unless the
person has received specific, written informed consent from the individual. As
used in this section, “specific” means written consent for each and every
category of action performed by the brain-computer interface.
(2) A person receiving written informed consent from an individual
shall keep a record of the individual’s consent.
(3) Consent obtained by using a consciousness bypass is not informed
consent.
(b) Revoking consent.
(1) An individual who has provided specific, written informed consent
allowing a brain-computer interface to be used to bypass the conscious
decision making of the individual pursuant to this section has the right to
revoke consent at any time thereafter by providing notice to the person initially
receiving the consent. This revocation of consent notice shall be as easy or
VT LEG #379396 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.366
2025 Page 6 of 6
easier for the individual to provide as compared to the requirements for
initially providing consent.
(2) An individual’s agent, guardian, or surrogate has the right to revoke
consent on behalf of the individual pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
§ 1892. PENALTY; ENFORCEMENT
(a) A violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in commerce under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, Vermont’s Consumer
Protection Act.
(b) A person who violates this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of
not more than $10,000.00 for each violation.
(c) The Attorney General shall have the same authority to make rules,
conduct civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring
civil actions as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1. Consumers
shall have the same rights and remedies as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63,
subchapter 1.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379396 v.1